District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

2-308.15

Corporation counsel investigations and prosecutions; powers of prosecuting authority; civil actions by individuals as qui tam plaintiffs; jurisdiction of courts.

Recodified as § 2-381.03.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 815, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 10(b), 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-117, § 4, 57 DCR 896
This section is referenced in § 2-381.05.